apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.es.dix
          <l>gieses</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gieran</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>giesen</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>giera</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>giese</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gidas</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gida</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gidos</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gido</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gemos</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>géis</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jamos</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jáis</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jan</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="acó/ger__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jan</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>ger<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="acoger">
        <p>
          <l>acó</l>
          <r>aco</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="converger">
        <p>
          <l>convér</l>
          <r>conver</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="coger">
        <p>
          <l>có</l>
          <r>co</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="encoger">
        <p>
          <l>encó</l>
          <r>enco</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="escoger">
        <p>
          <l>escó</l>
          <r>esco</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="proteger">
        <p>
          <l>proté</l>
          <r>prote</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="recoger">
        <p>
          <l>recó</l>
          <r>reco</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="sobrecoger">
        <p>
          <l>sobrecó</l>
          <r>sobreco</r>
        </p>
        <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
      </e>
<e lm="coger por el cuello" a="mioara">
   <p>
   <l>có</l>
   <r>co</r>
   </p>
    <par n="acó/ger__vblex"/>
    <p>
      <l><b/>por<b/>el<b/>cuello</l>
      <r><g><b/>por<b/>el<b/>cuello</g></r>
    </p>
 </e>
